Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Illegal presence in a stolen motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (a) A person who enters into or is found in a motor vehicle that the person knows or has reason to know was taken or stolen in violation of subdivision 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) after being previously convicted or adjudicated delinquent for violating paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end